Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Home
Health Practice Modernization Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15768 TJ 01/01/26






Req. No. 15768 Page 1